Utah statutes.
16-6a-1011.   Bylaw changing quorum or voting requirement for members.

(1) (a)  If authorized by the articles of incorporation, the members may adopt, amend, or repeal bylaws that fix a greater quorum or voting requirement for members, or voting groups of members, than is required by this chapter.

(b)  An action by the members under Subsection (1)(a) is subject to Parts 6 and 7.

(2)  Bylaws that fix a greater quorum requirement or a greater voting requirement for members pursuant to Section 16-6a-716 may not be amended by the board of directors.

